Massachusetts, session 194th, H3992.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The fourth paragraph of section 34M of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- In a trial for
personal injuries involving a motor vehicle accident, the amount of personal injury protection
benefits paid by the insurer to the insured may be disclosed to the jury with the additional
information: (i) that such payments must be repaid; and (ii) the amount shall be deducted by the
court from any judgement made by the jury.
of 1